data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
 <pardef n="λησμ/ονώ__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>όνησα</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσαμε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσατε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήθηκε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνησε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήθηκαν</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όνησαν</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσει</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονηθεί</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσω</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσουμε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσετε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονηθεί</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσει</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονηθούν</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονήσουν</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονώ</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονούμε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονείτε</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονείται</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονεί</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονιέται</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονούνται</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονούν</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονιούνται</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ονώντας</l><r>ονώ<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
<pardef n="αν/αλώνω__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>άλωσα</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθήκαμε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσαμε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωνόμαστε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλισκόμαστε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσατε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άλωσε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώθηκε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άλωνε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώθηκαν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άλωσαν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθεί</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσει</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσω</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθώ</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθούμε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσουμε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσει</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθεί</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλωθούν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώσουν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνω</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνουμε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνεστε</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνεται</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνει</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλίσκεται</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλίσκει</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνονται</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλώνουν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλίσκονται</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αλίσκουν</l><r>αλώνω<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="λησμονώ"><i>λησμ</i><par n="λησμ/ονώ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="καταναλώνω"><i>καταν</i><par n="αν/αλώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="αναλώνω"><i>αν</i><par n="αν/αλώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="λησμονώ"><i>λησμ</i><par n="λησμ/ονώ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="καταναλώνω"><i>καταν</i><par n="αν/αλώνω__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="αναλώνω"><i>αν</i><par n="αν/αλώνω__vblex"/></e>
